es: Uso recomendado de la pantalla: Comercial; Corporativo; Educación; Finanzas; Gobierno; Cuidado de la salud; Venta al por menor; Transporte; Universal; Otros
zh-TW: 顯示器建議用途: 商業; 企業; 教育; 金融; 政府; 衛生保健; 零售; 交通; 通用; 其他
tr: Önerilen kullanımı görüntüle: Ticari; Kurumsal; Eğitim; Finans; Devlet; Sağlık; Perakende; Ulaştırma; Her türden mekana uygun; Diğer
vi: Hiển thị khuyến nghị sử dụng: Thương mại; Công ty; Giáo dục; Tài chính; Chính phủ; Chăm sóc sức khỏe; Bán lẻ; Vận tải; Phổ biến; Khác
ru: Назначение выставочного стенда: Коммерческий; Корпоративный; Образование; Финансы; Правительство; Здравоохранение; Розничная торговля; Транспорт; Универсальный; Другой
nl: Aanbevolen gebruik weergeven: Commercieel; Bedrijven; Onderwijs; Financiën; Overheid; Gezondheidszorg; Retail; Vervoer; Universeel; Andere
cs: Zobrazení doporučeného použití: Komerční; Firemní; Vzdělání; Finance; Státní správa; Zdravotnictví; Prodejny; Přeprava; Univerzální; Jiné
nb: Vis anbefalt bruk: Kommersiell; Bedrift; Utdanning; Finans; Myndighet; Helsevesen; Detaljhandel; Transport; Universal; Annet
ja: ディスプレイの推奨用途: 業務用; 企業向け; 教育; 金融; 政府; 健康管理; 小売; トランスポーテーション; ユニバーサル; その他
fi: Näytön suositeltu käyttötapa: Kaupallinen; Yritys; Koulutus; Finanssi; Hallitus; Terveydenhuolto; Jälleenmyynti; Kuljetus; Yleinen; Muu
bg-BG: Показване на препоръчителната употреба: Комерсиален; Корпоративен; Образование; Финанси; Правителство; Здравеопазване; Търговия на дребно; Транспорт; Универсален; Други
hr-HR: Preporučena uporaba izloga: Komercijalna; Korporativna; Obrazovanje; Financije; Vlada; Zdravstvo; Maloprodaja; Prijevoz; Univerzalna; Ostalo
ko: 디스플레이 권장 용도: 상업용; 기업; 교육; 재정; 정부; 보건 의료; 소매; 교통; 범용; 기타
pt-PT: Utilização recomendada do ecrã: Comercial; Corporativo; Educação; Finanças; Governo; Assistência médica; Retalho; Transportes; Universal; Outro
zh-CN: 显示推荐用法: 商业; 企业; 教育; 金融; 政府; 医疗; 零售业; 运输; 通用; 其他
fr: Afficher l’utilisation recommandée: Commercial; Entreprise; Éducation; Finance; Gouvernement; Pour la santé; Commerce de détail; Transports; Universel; Autre
hu: Standok javasolt használata: Kereskedelmi; Vállalati; Oktatási; Pénzügyi; Kormányzati; Egészségügyi; Kiskereskedelmi; Közlekedési; Általános; Egyéb
th: การใช้งานที่แนะนำของจอแสดงผล: เชิงพาณิชย์; องค์กร; การศึกษา; การเงิน; รัฐบาล; ดูแลสุขภาพ; การค้าปลีก; การขนส่ง; อเนกประสงค์; อื่นๆ
sk-SK: Zobraziť odporúčané použitie: Komerčný; Firemný; Vzdelávací; Finančný; Vládny; Zdravotnícky; Maloobchodný; Dopravný; Univerzálny; Iné
it: Uso consigliato del display: Commerciale; Aziendale; Istruzione; Finanziario; Governativo; Sanitario; Negozi; Trasporti; Universale; Altro
el: Συνιστώμενη χρήση εκθεσιακών περιπτέρων: Εμπόριο; Εταιρικά θέματα; Εκπαίδευση; Οικονομικά; Διακυβέρνηση; Υγειονομική περίθαλψη; Λιανικό εμπόριο; Μεταφοράς; Universal; Άλλο
sl-SI: Priporočena uporaba stojnice: Komercialno; Korporacija; Izobraževanje; Finance; Vlada; Zdravstvo; Maloprodaja; Prevozništvo; Univerzalno; Drugo
lt-LT: Rekomenduojama ekrano paskirtis: Komercinis; Įmonėms; Ugdymui; Finansams; Vyriausybei; Sveikatos priežiūros įstaigoms; Mažmeninei prekybai; Viešajam transportui; Universalus; Kita
pt-BR: Exibir uso recomendado: Comercial; Corporativo; Educação; Finança; Governo; Saúde; Varejo; Transporte; Universal; Outro
da: Vis anbefalet brug: Kommerciel; Virksomhed; Uddannelse; Finans; Regering; Sundhed; Detail; Transport; Universal; Andet
pl: Zalecane użycie wyświetlacza: Commercial; Corporate; Edukacja; Finanse; Rządowa; Opieka zdrowotna; Sprzedaż detaliczna; Transport; Uniwersalny; Inne
ro-RO: Destinație de utilizare afișaj: Comercial; Corporativ; Educație; Finanțe; Guvern; Sănătate; Retail; Transport; Universală; Altele
sv: Rekommenderad displayanvändning: Kommersiell; Företagsrelaterat; Utbildning; Finans; Offentlig förvaltning; Hälso- och sjukvård; Detaljhandel; Transport; Universell; Övrigt
de: Empfohlene Verwendung des Displays: Kommerziell; Unternehmen; Bildung; Finanzwesen; Behörden; Gesundheitswesen; Einzelhandel; Transport; Universell; Sonstiges
en: Display recommended use: Commercial; Corporate; Education; Finance; Government; Healthcare; Retail; Transportation; Universal; Other